Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.275

Bulk fertilizer distribution license—Fee.

(1) No person may distribute a bulk fertilizer in this state until a license to distribute has been obtained by that person. An annual license is required for each out-of-state or in-state location that distributes bulk fertilizer in Washington state. An application for each location must be filed on forms provided by the business licensing system established under chapter 19.02 RCW and must be accompanied by an annual fee of fifty dollars per location. The license expires on the business license expiration date.

(2) An application for license must include the following:

(a) The name and address of licensee.

(b) Any other information required by the department by rule.

(3) The name and address shown on the license must be shown on all labels, pertinent invoices, and storage facilities for fertilizer distributed by the licensee in this state.

(4) If an application for license renewal provided for in this section is not filed prior to the business license expiration date, a delinquency fee of fifty dollars must be assessed and added to the original fee and must be paid by the applicant before the renewal license is issued. The assessment of this delinquency fee does not prevent the department from taking any other action as provided for in this chapter.

[ 2021 c 282 s 1; 2013 c 144 s 8; 1998 c 36 s 3; 1993 c 183 s 2.]

NOTES:

Application date—2021 c 282: "All new or renewal applications for registration under this act received on or after June 1, 2021, are subject to the provisions of this act, including all fees required by this act." [ 2021 c 282 s 5.]

Effective date—2021 c 282: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 1, 2021." [ 2021 c 282 s 6.]

Short title—1998 c 36: See note following RCW 15.54.265.